src/fst/morphology/incoming/verb_inner_affixes.lexc
!
! ni-PFV
!
LEXICON ni-PFV

@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@D.PREFIX@          ni-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@R.PREFIX.INNER@    ni-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@   ni-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.ni@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@    ni-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.nis@@D.PREFIX@         nis-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.nis@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   nis-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.nis@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  nis-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.nis@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@   nis-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.nii@@D.PREFIX@         nii-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.nii@@R.PREFIX.INNER@   nii-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.nii@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@  nii-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.nii@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@   nii-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

LEXICON ni-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix
! FIXME: no documentation for this form; dummy values below
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ní    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ní    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìní   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìní   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE

LEXICON ni-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìnis  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE (M/L -> L)
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìní   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìní   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìnaà  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìniì  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìnaS  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìní   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìní   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE

LEXICON ni-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ní    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ní    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìní   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìní   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE


LEXICON nis-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix
! FIXME: no documentation for this form; dummy values below
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìnís  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìnís  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE

LEXICON nis-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìnis  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìnís  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìnís  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìnaà  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìniì  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìnaS  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìnís  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìnís  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE

LEXICON nis-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nís   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nís   #;


LEXICON nii-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix
! FIXME: no documentation for this form; dummy values below
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@níí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìníí  #;	! FLOATING L-TONE
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìníí  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE

LEXICON nii-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
! FIXME: no documentation for this form; dummy values below
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìnis   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìníí   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìníí   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìnaà   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìniì   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìnaS   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìníí   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìníí   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE

LEXICON nii-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@níí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #; 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@naS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@íí    #;	
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@íí    #;	 


!
! si-IPFV
!
! si-IPFV and si-PFV share the exact same inflectional markers, and differ
! only in aspect (imperfective vs. perfective).  We can therefore tag all
! si-IPFV forms passing through this lexicon as imperfective, then reuse
! the TAMA chunks defined in si-AFF below.
!
LEXICON si-IPFV

@U.ASPECT.IPFV@                              si-AFF ;


!
! si-PFV
!
! si-IPFV and si-PFV share the exact same inflectional markers, and differ
! only in aspect (imperfective vs. perfective).  We can therefore tag all
! si-PFV forms passing through this lexicon as perfective, then reuse the
! TAMA chunks defined in si-AFF below.
!
LEXICON si-PFV

@U.ASPECT.PFV@                               si-AFF ;


!
! si-AFF
!
! Note that 3PL gi- and 4 ts'i- (verb_middle_affixes) don't receive low tone
! like other inner prefixes in this paradigm (e.g., gisjón "they are old",
! not *gìsjón).
!
! To make sure that 3PL and 4 forms receive the right tone, we make sure that
! forms involving these two prefixes (and no other inner prefixes) end up
! heading through the -MiddlePrefix continuation lexica below, which have
! 3PL and 4 inflectional chunks without the low tone.
!
! TODO: test this with a few transitive verbs and make sure that the tone
! is coming out properly in all cases! (need to be sure that transitive
! verb inflection, which is also a kind of middle prefixation, is also coming
! out with the right tone assignments)
!

LEXICON si-AFF

@U.TAMA.si@@D.PREFIX@                        si-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.TAMA.si@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                  si-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.TAMA.si@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                 si-AFF-MiddlePrefix ;
@U.TAMA.si@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                  si-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.TAMA.sis@@D.PREFIX@                       sis-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.TAMA.sis@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                 sis-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.TAMA.sis@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                sis-AFF-MiddlePrefix ;
@U.TAMA.sis@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                 sis-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.TAMA.sii@@D.PREFIX@                       sii-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.TAMA.sii@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                 sii-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.TAMA.sii@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                sii-AFF-MiddlePrefix ;
@U.TAMA.sii@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                 sii-AFF-OuterPrefix ;


LEXICON si-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@si    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@saà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@saS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;  
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #; 

LEXICON si-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsis   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
! When an inner prefix is present, 1SG forms also appear as Cas (e.g.,
! dìsists'ón ~ dasts'ón "I heard (it)", zìsisyín ~ zasyín "I killed (it)".
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@as     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsí    #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsaà   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsiì   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsaS   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìs     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs     #;

LEXICON si-AFF-MiddlePrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsis   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsí    #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsaà   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsiì   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsaS   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s      #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s      #;

LEXICON si-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@si    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@saà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@saS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;


LEXICON sis-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@saà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@saS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;

LEXICON sis-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsis   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE (M/L -> L)
! When an inner prefix is present, 1SG forms also appear as Cas (e.g.,
! dìsists'ón ~ dasts'ón "I heard (it)", zìsisyín ~ zasyín "I killed (it)".
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@as     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsís   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE (M/L -> L)
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsaà   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE (M/L -> L)
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsiì   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE (M/L -> L)
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsaS   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE (M/L -> L)
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìs     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs     #;

LEXICON sis-AFF-MiddlePrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsis   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE (M/L -> L)
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìsís   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE (M/L -> L)
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ìs     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsaà   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE (M/L -> L)
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsiì   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE (M/L -> L)
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ìsaS   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE (M/L -> L)
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s   #;

LEXICON sis-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@sis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@saà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@siì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@saS   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;
